New Jersey, session 221, S1901.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The board of county commissioners of any county in which the population of greenhead flies has become a local nuisance or pest problem may authorize, designate, and employ the county mosquito extermination commission to conduct a program for the reduction of the greenhead fly population in affected areas of the county which shall consist of the manufacture, placement, and maintenance of greenhead fly box traps developed by Rutgers, the State University. 2.    There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection $50,000 from the General Fund, to be distributed as grants to affected counties for the purpose of funding a greenhead fly extermination program pursuant to the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.